Hawaii, session 2025, GM1119.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 11-381, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
n Campaign funds may be used by a candidate, treasurer,
candidate committee:
For any purpose directly related:
(A) In the case of the candidate, to the candidate's
own campaign; or
(B) In the case of a candidate committee or treasurer
of a candidate committee, to the campaign of the
candidate, question, or issue with which they are
directly associated;
To purchase or lease consumer goods, vehicles.
equipment, and services that provide a mixed benefit
to the candidate [-;-- The] ; provided that the
candidate [-—hewcvca^r] shall reimburse the candidate's
candidate committee for the candidate's personal use
of these items unless the personal use is de minimis;
2025-0068 SB SMA.docx 1

Page 2
S.B. NO. 1202.
(3) To make donations to any community service,
educational, youth, recreational, charitable,
scientific, or literary organization; provided that in
any election period, the total amount of all donations
shall be [ae] not more than twice the maximum amount
that one person may contribute to that candidate
pursuant to section 11-357; provided further that no
donations shall be made from the date the candidate
files nomination papers to the date of the general
election unless the candidate is:
(A) Declared to be duly and legally elected to the
office for which the person is a candidate
pursuant to section 12-41;
(B) Deemed and declared to be duly and legally
elected to the office for which the person is a
candidate pursuant to section 12-42; or
(C) Unsuccessful in the primary or special primary
election;
(4) To make donations to any public school or public
library; provided that in any election period, the
total amount of all contributions shall be [«©] not
2025-0068 SB SMA.docx 2
■Hiiinmiii

Page 3
S.B. NO.
more than twice the maximum amount that one person may
contribute to that candidate pursuant to section 11-
357; provided further that any donation under this
paragraph shall not be aggregated with or imputed
toward any limitation on donations pursuant to
paragraph (3);
(5) To award scholarships to full-time students attending
an institution of higher education or a vocational
education school in a program leading to a degree,
certificate, or other recognized educational
credential; provided that in any election period, the
total amount of all scholarships awarded shall be [«©]
not more than twice the maximum amount that one person
may contribute to that candidate pursuant to section
11-357; provided further that no awards shall be made
from the filing deadline for nomination papers to the
date of the general election unless the candidate is;
(A) Declared to be duly and legally elected to the
office for which the person is a candidate
pursuant to section 12-41;
2025-0068 SB SMA.docx 3
■iMiiunmiin

Page 4
S.B. NO. 12.0^
(B) Deemed and declared to be duly and legally
elected to the office for which the person is a
candidate pursuant to section 12-42; or
(C) Unsuccessful in the primary or special primary
election;
(6) To purchase not more than two tickets for each event
held by another candidate or committee, regardless of
whether the event constitutes a fundraiser as defined
in section 11-342;
(7) To make contributions to the candidate's party so long
as the contributions are not earmarked for another
candidate; [er]
(8) To pay for ordinary and necessary expenses incurred in
connection with the candidate's duties as a holder of
an office, including expenses incurred for memberships
in civic or community groups[—]; or
(9) To pay for the candidate's child care or vital
household dependent care costs; provided that:
(A) The child care or vital household dependent care
costs would not have been incurred but for the
2025-0068 SB SMA.docx
■iiininiinBHiiH

Page 5
S.B. NO.
candidate's participation in the candidate's own
campaign activity;
(B) Qualifying child care or vital household
dependent care costs shall be limited to costs
for child care or vital household dependent care
services from the date the candidate files
nomination papers to the day after the date of
the primary or general election in which the
candidate appears on the ballot; and
(C) The child care or vital household dependent care
services shall not be provided by immediate
family.
As used in this paragraph:
"Child" means a person under twelve years of age
who is a biological, adopted, or foster child; a
stepchild; or a legal ward of the candidate.
"Child care" means a situation where a person or
organization has agreed to assume and has been
entrusted with responsibility for the supervision,
development, safety, and protection of the candidate's
child.
2025-0068 SB SMA.docx 5

Page 6
S.B. NO. 12 oz
"Vital household dependent" means a person, such
as a family member, living in the candidate's
household who is physically or mentally incapable of
self-care.
"Vital household dependent care" means a
situation where a person or organization has agreed to
assume and has been entrusted with responsibility for
the supervision, development, safety, and protection
of the candidate's vital household dependent."
SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.

INTRODUCED BY:
2025-0068 SB SMA.docx 6

1202
S.B. NO.
APPROVED this 22nd day of April , 2025
STATE OF HAWAI-I

S.B.No. 1202
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: March 4, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: APR 0 3 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the House
of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of
2025.
—
Speaker, House of Representatives
/
Clerk, House of Representatives
958